Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.635

Confirmation notices—Form, contents.

Confirmation notices must be on a form prescribed by, or approved by, the secretary of state and must request that the voter verify that the voter continues to reside at the address of record and desires to continue to use that address for voting purposes, or provide a new residence address for voting, or provide information that the voter no longer resides in the state. The notice must inform the voter that if the voter does not respond to the notice and does not vote in either of the next two federal general elections, the voter's registration will be canceled.

[ 2023 c 466 s 26; 2009 c 369 s 32; 2003 c 111 s 242. Prior: 1994 c 57 s 45. Formerly RCW 29.10.200.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.